Utah statutes.
76-10-601.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Person" means any individual, organization, group, association,
partnership, corporation, or any combination of them;
(2)  "Professional fund raiser" means any person who for compensation or any
other consideration plans, conducts, or manages in this state, the
solicitation of contributions for or on behalf of any charitable organization
or any other person, or who engages in the business of, or holds himself out
to persons in this state as independently engaged in the business of
soliciting contributions for such purpose, but shall not include a bona fide
officer or employee of a charitable organization;
(3)  "Professional solicitor" means any person who is employed or retained for
compensation by a professional fund raiser to solicit contributions in this
state for charitable purposes;
(4)  "Charitable organization" means any organization that is benevolent,
philanthropic, patriotic, or eleemosynary or one purporting to be such;
(5)  "Contribution" means the promise or grant of any money or property of any
kind or value.
